Montana, session 2025, SB495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 17-6-606, MCA, is amended to read:
"17-6-606. Tobacco settlement accounts -- purpose -- uses. (1) The purpose of this section is to
dedicate a portion of the tobacco settlement proceeds to fund statewide programs for tobacco disease
prevention designed to:
(a) discourage children from starting use of tobacco;
(b) assist adults in quitting use of tobacco; and
(c) provide funds for the children's health insurance program.
(2) An amount equal to 32% of the total yearly tobacco settlement proceeds received after June
30, 2003, must be deposited in a state special revenue account. Subject to subsection (5), the funds referred to
in this subsection may be used only for funding statewide programs for tobacco disease prevention designed to
prevent children from starting tobacco use and to help adults who want to quit tobacco use. The department of
public health and human services shall manage the tobacco disease prevention programs and shall adopt rules
to implement the programs. In adopting rules, the department shall consider the standards contained in Best
Practices for Comprehensive Tobacco Control Programs--August 1999 or its successor document, published
by the U.S. department of health and human services, centers for disease control and prevention.
(3) An amount equal to 17% of the total yearly tobacco settlement proceeds received after June
30, 2003, must be deposited in a state special revenue account. Subject to subsection (5), the funds referred to
in this subsection may be used only for matching funds to secure the maximum amount of federal funds for the
Children's Health Insurance Program Act provided for in Title 53, chapter 4, part 10.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 495
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 495
(4) Funds deposited in a state special revenue account, as provided in subsection (2) or (3), that
are not appropriated within 2 years after the date of deposit must be transferred to the trust fund.
(5) The legislature shall appropriate money from the state special revenue accounts provided for in
this section for programs for tobacco disease prevention, and for the programs referred to in the subsection
establishing the account, and for funding the tobacco prevention advisory board.
(6) Programs funded under this section that are private in nature may be funded through
contracted services."
Section 2. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is repealed:
17-6-610. Tobacco prevention advisory board.
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 495
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 495, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 495
INTRODUCED BY G. HERTZ
AN ACT ELIMINATING THE TOBACCO PREVENTION ADVISORY BOARD; AMENDING SECTION 17-6-606,
MCA; REPEALING SECTION 17-6-610, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”